Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3302
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to promote computer science and technology education in each school district in order to (1) provide students the skills and competencies to compete in a twenty-first-century workforce, (2) develop skills that translate to high-skill, high-wage jobs, and (3) encourage the creation and retention of new, high-paying jobs in Nebraska.

Laws 2022, LB1112, § 2.